New York, session 2025-2026, S5610.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 3 of section 30.10 of the criminal procedure 2 law is amended by adding a new paragraph (i) to read as follows: 3 (i) A prosecution for assault in the first degree, as defined in 4 section 120.10 of the penal law, committed against a member of the same 5 family or household, as defined in subdivision one of section 530.11 of 6 this chapter, must be commenced within ten years after the commission 7 thereof. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10238-01-5